New York, session 2025-2026, A9579.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and 2 breeding law is amended by adding a new subdivision 5-a to read as 3 follows: 4 5-a. (a) As used in this subdivision, "high-value customer program" 5 means any "VIP", "elite", "preferred", "high-value", or similarly-desig- 6 nated program that provides enhanced incentives, bonuses, rebates, dedi- 7 cated account management, or other special benefits tied to wagering 8 activity. 9 (b) No mobile sports wagering operator, or any affiliate or agent 10 thereof shall offer, enroll, or permit any person under twenty-five 11 years of age to participate in any high-value customer program. 12 (c)(i) Prior to enrolling any person in a high-value customer program, 13 a mobile sports wagering operator shall conduct an affordability review 14 to determine whether the person's wagering activity is affordable and 15 sustainable, and does not pose a risk of gambling-related harm. 16 (ii) Such review shall include, at a minimum: identity and age verifi- 17 cation; know-your-customer due-diligence; verification of income or 18 financial capacity sufficient to support wagering levels; review of 19 wagering patterns for indicators of harm; whether such person has ever 20 been on any state or private gambling self-exclusion list; and any other 21 factor required by the gaming commission. 22 (iii) A person who has been placed on any state or private gambling 23 self-exclusion list shall not be eligible for any high-value customer 24 program for at least two years after such person's self-exclusion period 25 has expired. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14401-01-6 A. 9579 2 1 (iv) Every mobile sports wagering operator shall maintain written 2 records of such reviews and shall re-evaluate each enrolled person at 3 least quarterly, or more frequently if indicators of harm appear. 4 (v) A mobile sports wagering operator shall deny or suspend high-value 5 customer status to any person who fails to provide information necessary 6 to complete the review required pursuant to this subdivision or if such 7 review indicates material risk of harm. 8 (d) No mobile sports wagering operator shall offer or provide, to any 9 person with high-value customer status, any incentive, reward, rebate, 10 bonus, or promotion that: 11 (i) is conditioned upon net losses, escalating losses, or wagering at 12 levels inconsistent with the affordability review; 13 (ii) encourages continuing to bet or increasing the size of a bet to 14 recoup losses from previous bets, increased frequency of play, or wager- 15 ing beyond preset limits; 16 (iii) offers gifts, hospitality, or other benefits conditioned on 17 reaching higher loss or spend thresholds; or 18 (iv) is otherwise determined by the gaming commission to present an 19 unreasonable risk of gambling-related harm. 20 (e) No person employed by or affiliated with a mobile sports wagering 21 operator may receive any remuneration based upon the number of bets 22 placed or the amount wagered by a person enrolled in a high-value 23 customer program. 24 (f) Mobile sport wagering operators shall maintain written policies 25 governing the operation of high-value programs, including eligibility 26 criteria, responsible-gaming safeguards, and internal controls. Such 27 programs shall be overseen by an employee holding a position approved by 28 the gaming commission, who shall be responsible for compliance with this 29 subdivision and all regulations promulgated hereunder. 30 (g) The commission shall promulgate rules to implement the require- 31 ments of this subdivision, including detailed affordability-check stand- 32 ards, reporting requirements, auditing procedures, and limitations on 33 incentives or marketing practices. 34 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.